Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1557YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 1 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13D Participation in 1 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or competitions 2 provided by public schools. 3 1. a. The board of directors of a school district shall 4 allow a student who resides within the school district and who 5 is enrolled in a nonpublic school to participate immediately 6 in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 7 competition that is provided by the school district, but that 8 is not provided by the nonpublic school, pursuant to the terms 9 of an agreement between the board of directors of the school 10 district and the authorities in charge of the nonpublic school 11 that provides for the eligibility of the student. 12 b. The board of directors of a school district shall allow a 13 student who resides within a contiguous school district and who 14 is enrolled in a nonpublic school to participate immediately 15 in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 16 competition that is provided by the school district, but that 17 is not provided by the nonpublic school or the studentâs school 18 district of residence, pursuant to the terms of an agreement 19 between the board of directors of the school district and the 20 authorities in charge of the nonpublic school that provides for 21 the eligibility of the student. 22 c. If the board of directors of a school district has 23 established a fee for the cost of a studentâs participation 24 in an extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 25 competition, a student who is enrolled in a nonpublic school 26 and is participating in a contest or competition at a public 27 school pursuant to paragraph âaâ or âbâ , or the studentâs parent 28 or guardian, shall be responsible for the payment of such fee. 29 The amount of such fee shall not exceed the amount of the fee 30 the board of directors of the school district has established 31 for students who are enrolled in the school district. 32 2. An organization, as defined in section 280.13, shall not 33 take into account the number of students who participate in an 34 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition 35 -1- LSB 1557YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 1 provided by a school district pursuant to this section when 1 determining the classification of a public school. 2 3. A student who participates in an extracurricular 3 interscholastic athletic contest or competition pursuant 4 to this section shall be deemed to satisfy the residence 5 requirements for purposes of section 256.46. 6 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 7 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 8